North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143C. State Budget Act.
Article 6. Administration of the Budget.
§ 143C-6-11.
Highway appropriation.

General Provisions. — Appropriations made for transportation projects are subject to the provisions in this section. If the provisions in this section conflict with the budget acts, the budget acts prevail.

Cash Flow Management of Transportation Projects. — Transportation Project funds shall be budgeted, expended, and accounted for on a “cash flow” basis. Pursuant to this end, transportation project contracts shall be planned and limited so payments due at any time will not exceed the cash available to pay them.

Appropriations Are for Payments and Contract Commitments to Be Made in the Appropriation Fiscal Year. — The appropriations for transportation projects are for maximum payments estimated to be made during the appropriation fiscal year and for maximum contracting authority for future years. Transportation project contracts shall be scheduled so that the total contract payments and other expenditures charged to projects in the fiscal year for each transportation project appropriation item will not exceed the current appropriations provided by the General Assembly and unspent prior appropriations made by the General Assembly for the particular appropriation item.

Payments Subject to Availability of Funds. — The annual appropriations for transportation projects shall be expended only to the extent that sufficient funds are available in the Highway Fund.

(d1)

Unanticipated Expenditures; Adjustment of Budget. —

In any fiscal year, when all funds allocated for snow and ice removal, and emergencies are depleted, the Department shall, in coordination with the Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM), reduce by the same percentage the budget for every departmental division, grant-in-aid, and category of expenditures, excluding personal services, to pay for any unanticipated expenditures from snow and ice removal, and emergencies. Within 30 days of an adjustment made pursuant to this subsection, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division.

Retainage Fully Funded. — The Department of Transportation shall fully fund retainage from transportation project contracts in the year in which the work is performed.

Seven and One Half Percent (7.5%) Cash Balance Required. — The Department of Transportation shall maintain an available cash balance at the end of each month equal to at least seven and one half percent (7.5%) of the total appropriations for the current fiscal year from the Highway Fund and the Highway Trust Fund. In projecting cash balances in future years, the Department shall use the estimated cash flow as specified in the Current Operations Appropriation Act. No further transportation project contract commitment may be entered into that would cause the cash position to fall below this requirement. In the event this cash position is not maintained, no further transportation project contract commitments may be entered into until the cash balance has been regained. Provided the Department may modify or supplement transportation contract commitments for existing transportation projects that (i) result in a savings from the total estimated project cost of the existing commitment, based on a cost-savings analysis, or (ii) relate to the needs of an existing transportation project to continue. Any federal funds on hand shall not be considered as cash for the purposes of this subsection.

Anticipation of Revenues. — In awarding State transportation project contracts requiring payments beyond a biennium, the Director may anticipate revenues as authorized and certified by the General Assembly to continue contract payments for up to seventy-five percent (75%) of the revenues which are estimated for the first fiscal year of the succeeding biennium and which are not required for other budget items. Up to fifty percent (50%) of the revenues not required for other budget items may be anticipated for the second and subsequent fiscal years’ contract payments. Up to forty percent (40%) of the revenues not required for other budget items may be anticipated for the first year of the second succeeding biennium and up to twenty percent (20%) of the revenues not required for other budget items may be anticipated for the second year of the second succeeding biennium.

Amounts Encumbered. — Transportation project appropriations may be encumbered in the amount of allotments made to the Department of Transportation by the Director for the estimated payments for transportation project contract work to be performed in the appropriation fiscal year. The allotments shall be multiyear allotments and shall be based on estimated revenues and shall be subject to the maximum contract authority contained in subsection (c) above. Payment for transportation project work performed pursuant to contract in any fiscal year other than the current fiscal year is subject to appropriations by the General Assembly. Transportation project contracts shall contain a schedule of estimated completion progress, and any acceleration of this progress shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation provided funds are available. The State reserves the right to terminate or suspend any transportation project contract, and any transportation project contract shall be so terminated or suspended if funds will not be available for payment of the work to be performed during that fiscal year pursuant to the contract. In the event of termination of any contract, the contractor shall be given a written notice of termination at least 60 days before completion of scheduled work for which funds are available. In the event of termination, the contractor shall be paid for the work already performed in accordance with the contract specifications.

Provision Incorporated in Contracts. — The provisions of subsection (h) of this section shall be incorporated verbatim in all transportation project contracts.

Existing Contracts Are Not Affected. — The provisions of this section shall not apply to transportation project contracts awarded by the Department of Transportation prior to July 15, 1980.

The Department of Transportation shall do all of the following:

Utilize cash flow financing to the extent possible to fund transportation projects with the goal of reducing the combined average daily cash balance of the Highway Fund and the Highway Trust Fund to an amount equal to between fifteen and twenty percent (15-20%) of the total appropriations for the current fiscal year from those funds. In projecting cash balances in future years, the Department shall use the estimated cash flow as specified in the Current Operations Appropriation Act. Any federal funds on hand shall not be considered as cash for the purposes of this subsection. The target amount shall include an amount necessary to make all municipal-aid funding requirements of the Department.

Establish necessary management controls to facilitate use of cash flow financing, such as establishment of a financial planning committee, development of a monthly financing report, establishment of appropriate fund cash level targets, review of revenue forecasting procedures, and reduction of accrued unbilled costs.

Report annually, on October 1 of each year, to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on its cash management policies and results.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to (i) prevent the inclusion of duplicative fund codes in the Highway Fund certified budget and (ii) correctly align authorized positions and associated operating costs with the appropriate purposes and definitions as defined in

G.S. 143C-1-1

. To that end, the Office of State Budget and Management, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, the Office of the State Controller, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly, shall include, as an appendix to the Highway Fund certified budget, object detail using the North Carolina Accounting System Uniform Chart of Accounts prescribed by the Office of the State Controller to provide a more detailed accounting of the proposed budgets and receipts and actual expenditures and revenue collections. This requirement includes applying object detail at the four-digit level for all accounts to full-time and part-time positions, to operating expenditures and receipts, and to intrafund transfers. Additionally, work order positions shall be budgeted within existing fund codes.

Target Amount Report. — No later than the fifteenth day of the month following a month where the combined average daily cash balance (cash balance) is outside of the target range established in subdivision (1) of subsection (k) of this section, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division on the reasons why the cash balance is outside of the target range, the actions to be taken by the Department to bring the cash balance into the target range, and the estimated amount of time it will take for the cash balance to return to the target range.

Cash Watch Weekly Report. — The Department of Transportation shall publish for public review a weekly report of the Department’s cash position, which shall be entitled “NCDOT Cash Watch Numbers.” The report shall be issued as a press release to all interested parties, posted on the Department’s Web site, and submitted to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division. In addition to any cash flow category the Department determines is beneficial to include, the report shall contain the following:

Total Cash and Bond Proceeds

Add Receipts

Subcategory of federal receipts

Subcategory of federal receipts (declared disaster reimbursements)

Less Disbursements

Payroll

Debt Service

STI Construction Costs

General Operating Costs

Map Act Claims/Settlements

State Aid Payments

Disaster-Related Costs

Other

Reserved Cash

GARVEE/Federal Repayment Reserve

Transportation Emergency Reserve

Trustee Accounts – Build NC proceeds

Trustee Accounts – GARVEE

Trustee Accounts – Other Bonds

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-91, s. 4.10(a), effective July 1, 2020.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-91, s. 4.10(a), effective July 1, 2020.

Unreserved Cash Balance Total

Highway Fund Total

Highway Trust Fund Total

Statutory Cash Requirement

Balance Sheet Report. — By the fifteenth day of each month, the Department of Transportation shall submit a balance sheet report of all assets, debits, liabilities, and fund balances with an explanation of significant changes from the prior month to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division.

[FEMA Reimbursement. —] The Department of Transportation shall expeditiously seek reimbursement from the federal government for all qualifying disaster expenditures. No later than the end of each month, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division that contains an itemized list of all disaster expenditures that qualify for federal reimbursement for which reimbursement is still pending and the expected amount, including the total amount spent for each disaster, the expected amount of reimbursement to be received for each disaster, the reimbursement amount received to date, the dates the work plans and reimbursement applications were submitted, and the expected dates of reimbursement.

Monthly Financial Statement Report. — Each month the Department of Transportation shall post on the Department’s Web site and submit to the Board of Transportation, the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division a financial statement report that includes the following information:

Revenues received by the Highway Fund and Highway Trust Fund for the month, broken down into category, and in relation to the revenue estimate for category used for the current fiscal year budget.

Expenditures by fund code for the month, and in relation to the current fiscal year certified budget and the Department’s Spend Plan.

Expenditures by Highway Division for the month, and in relation to the current fiscal year allocation of funds for maintenance activities made by the Department pursuant to G.S. 136-44.6.

Expenditures by Highway Division from the Reserve for General Maintenance in the Highway Fund (GMR) for the month, broken down into category, and in relation to the current budget year allocation of funds for each category.

Expenditures by Highway Division on capital and Strategic Transportation Investment (STI) projects, and in relation to the current budget year allocation of funds for capital and STI projects.

Projected revenues and Spend Plan of the Department for the next 18 months, noting any changes.

Accounts payable, including the number of contracts, invoices paid, and payments pending. The report shall also include the number of days between an invoice being submitted and being approved and the number of days between approval and payment. The Department shall also report the number of contracts breached and invoices the Department could not pay in full, including the age of those invoices and the status of any negotiated resolutions.

Year-End Report. — At the end of each fiscal year, no later than July 15, the Department shall post on the Department’s Web site and submit to the Board of Transportation, the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division a year-end summary of information required in the monthly financial statement report under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (q) of this section for the previous fiscal year, including a comparison to the Department’s Spend Plan for that period.

No later than September 1 of each year, the Department of Transportation shall submit to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division an annual report on the prior fiscal year allocations and expenditures for each highway division that contains the following information:

A chart detailing all Highway Fund allocations allotted to each highway division by category and purpose, the actual amount spent by each division, and any funds remaining for each division for the fiscal year.

The amount of funds reallocated between divisions under G.S. 136-44.6 by division source and recipient.

The overdrafts and carryforward amounts in total and by division.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2014-100, s. 34.23(a); 2018-5, s. 34.8(b); 2019-251, ss. 1.3(c), 1.5(a), 2.1(a); 2020-91, ss. 4.8, 4.10(a), (b), 5.2(a), 5.3(a); 2020-97, s. 3.18; 2021-180, ss. 41.21, 41.22.

§ 143C-6-11.1.
Department of Transportation Spend Plan.

The Department of Transportation shall develop a comprehensive cash-spending plan, known as the “Spend Plan,” that is based on the appropriations of the General Assembly, to spend money from any source, including federal funds and bond proceeds, for programs, functions, activities or objects, by the Department.

The Department shall present the Spend Plan to the Board of Transportation, the Transportation Oversight Manager at the Office of State Budget and Management, and the State Budget Director for approval.

The Board of Transportation, the Transportation Oversight Manager at the Office of State Budget and Management, and the State Budget Director shall either approve the Spend Plan or report any objections to the Spend Plan with specificity and reasons for the objections in writing to the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on the Department of Transportation, the Chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Transportation, and the Fiscal Research Division if the General Assembly is in session, or to the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division if the General Assembly is not in session. Upon receipt of the Spend Plan, approval or a report must be completed within 30 days.

Any modifications to the Spend Plan or expenditures outside of the Spend Plan shall be submitted for approval as provided in subsection (b) of this section prior to implementation.

History.

2020-91, s. 5.4; 2021-180, s. 41.4.

§ 143C-6-12.
Quarterly report on State agency reorganizations and movements of positions.

The Office of State Budget and Management shall report quarterly to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the appropriate Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on reorganizations of State agencies and movements of State agency positions. Each report submitted pursuant to this section shall include all of the following information for the previous quarter:

A list of all reorganizations within State agencies or between State agencies.

A list of all positions moved within a State agency or between State agencies.

A statement of the purpose of each reorganization and position movement undertaken and of the legal authority under which each reorganization and position movement was made.

History.

2014-100, s. 6.10.

§ 143C-6-13.
Results first annual report.

By December 1 of each year, the Office of State Budget and Management shall submit an annual report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government on the progress in implementing the cost-benefit analysis model for use in crafting policy and budget decisions. The report may include recommendations for legislation.

History.

2021-180, s. 37.5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 37.5(a), effective November 18, 2021, and applicable to reports submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§§ 143C-6-14 through 143C-6-20.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Non-State Entities Receiving State Funds.

§ 143C-6-21.
Payments to nonprofits.

Except as otherwise provided by law, an annual appropriation of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less to or for the use of a nonprofit corporation may be made in a single annual payment, in the discretion of the Director of the Budget. An annual appropriation of more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to or for the use of a nonprofit corporation shall be made in quarterly or monthly payments, in the discretion of the Director of the Budget.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2013-360, s. 6.12(o).

Cap State Funded Portion of Nonprofit Salaries.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 5.3, provides: “No more than one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) in State funds, including any interest earnings accruing from those funds, may be used for the annual salary of any individual employee of a nonprofit organization.”

For prior provisions, see Session Laws
2013-360, s. 6.14 and Session Laws
2015-241, s. 6.26.

§ 143C-6-22.
Use of State funds by non-State entities.

Disbursement and Use of State Funds. — Every non-State entity that receives, uses, or expends any State funds shall use or expend the funds only for the purposes for which they were appropriated by the General Assembly. State funds include federal funds that flow through the State Treasury.

Compliance by Non-State Entities. — If the Director of the Budget finds that a non-State entity has spent or encumbered State funds for an unauthorized purpose, or fails to submit or falsifies the information required by

G.S. 143C-6-23

or any other provision of law, the Director shall take appropriate administrative action to ensure that no further irregularities or violations of law occur and shall report to the Attorney General any facts that pertain to an apparent violation of a criminal law or an apparent instance of malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in connection with the use of State funds. Appropriate administrative action may include suspending or withholding the disbursement of State funds and recovering State funds previously disbursed.

Civil Actions. — Civil actions to recover State funds or to obtain other mandatory orders in the name of the State on relation of the Attorney General, or in the name of the Office of State Budget and Management, shall be filed in the General Court of Justice in Wake County.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

Rural Economic Development Center/Infrastructure Program.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 14.17(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 13.14, provides: “(a) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the North Carolina Rural Economic Development Center, Inc. (Rural Center), the sum of thirteen million four hundred sixty-two thousand forty-three dollars ($13,462,043)) for the 2012-2013 fiscal year shall be allocated as follows:

“(1) To continue the North Carolina Infrastructure Program. The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to local governments to construct critical water and wastewater facilities and to provide other infrastructure needs, including technology needs, to sites where these facilities will generate private job-creating investment. The grants under this Program shall not be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 143-355.4

.

“(2) To provide matching grants or loans to local governments in distressed areas that will productively reuse vacant buildings and properties, with priority given to towns or communities with populations of less than 5,000.

“(3) To provide grants and technical assistance to reinvigorate the economies of towns with populations of less than 7,500, and to invest in economic innovation that stimulates business and job growth in distressed areas.

“(4) Recipients of grant funds appropriated under this section shall contribute a cash match for the grant that is equivalent to at least five percent (5%) of the grant amount. The cash match shall come from local resources and may not be derived from other State or federal grant funds or from funds provided by the Rural Center.

“(b) In awarding grants under this section, the Rural Center shall give preference to a resident company. For purposes of this section, the term ‘resident company’ means a company that has paid unemployment taxes or income taxes in this State and whose principal place of business is located in this State. An application for a project that serves an economically distressed area shall have priority over a project that does not. A grant to assist with water infrastructure needs is not subject to the provisions of

G.S. 143-355.4

.

“(c) For the 2012-2013 fiscal year, the Rural Center may use up to three percent (3%) of the funds appropriated in this section to cover its expenses in administering the North Carolina Economic Infrastructure Program.

“(d) By September 1 of each year, and more frequently as requested, the Rural Center shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division concerning the progress of the North Carolina Economic Infrastructure Program in the prior State fiscal year.”

For prior provisions relating to the North Carolina Infrastructure Program, see Session Laws 2004-88, s. 2(a)-(f), Session Laws 2005-276, s. 13.12(a)-(f), as amended by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 12.3(b), Session Laws 2007-323, s. 13.13(a)-(d), and Session Laws 2009-451, s. 14.28(a)-(e), as amended by Session Laws 2010-31, s. 14.20.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 14.20(a)-(i), as amended by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 38, provides: “(a) Appropriation. — There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina Rural Economic Development Center, Inc., (Rural Center) the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the 2011-2012 fiscal year in nonrecurring funds and the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the 2012-2013 fiscal year in nonrecurring funds to be used to provide grants to local government units for infrastructure needs as provided in this section.

“(b) Definitions. — The following definitions shall apply in this section, unless otherwise provided:

“(1) Economically distressed area. — An economically distressed county as defined in G.S. 143B-437.01.

“(2) Private sector jobs. — Jobs that are located in or will be created in private, for-profit enterprises.

“(3) Rural county. — Any of the 85 rural counties served by the Rural Center.

“(c) Eligible Applicants; Eligible Projects. — A local government unit is eligible for a Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant under the provisions of this section if it meets the eligibility requirements provided in subsection (d) of this section. The funds appropriated in this section may be used to provide grants that meet the requirements of subsections (d) and (e) of this section. Projects addressing the following infrastructure needs are eligible for receiving a Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant under the provisions of this section:

“(1) Public wastewater collection system upgrade, extension, improvements.

“(2) Public wastewater treatment works.

“(3) Public water system upgrade, extension, improvements.

“(4) Natural gas availability.

“(5) Fiber availability.

“(6) Building restoration or upfits.

“(7) Other infrastructure needs as may be determined by the Rural Center’s Board of Directors.

“(d) Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grants. — A Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant is available to supplement other funds to be applied to the construction or installation costs of an eligible project. Other funds contributed to the project may include federal funds, State funds, and local funds, including contributions from private sector enterprises that may benefit from the proposed improvements. A Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant is subject to the following provisions:

“(1) Eligibility. — A local government unit is eligible for a Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant if it is a rural county or is located in a rural county.

“(2) Maximum grant amount. — Grant funds shall be available based upon the number of private sector jobs to be created as a result of the investment from the Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant Fund. An applicant for a grant may request up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per job to be created. An applicant for a Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant shall not receive more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for a proposed infrastructure project.

“(3) Matching funds. — A local government unit shall match a Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant on a dollar-for-dollar basis. As part of the matching funds, recipients of grant funds under the provisions of this section shall contribute a cash match for the grant that is equivalent to at least five percent (5%) of the grant amount. The required applicant cash-matching contribution shall come from local resources and may not be derived from other State or federal grant funds or from funds provided by the Rural Center.

“(e) Criteria for Grants. — All requests for Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grants shall do all of the following:

“(1) Document the infrastructure needs that the project will address.

“(2) Specify the number of jobs that will be created as a result of the infrastructure improvements proposed for funding assistance.

“(3) Document the availability of all matching funds.

“(4) Identify the private enterprises that will be creating the jobs and provide documentation that the enterprises will agree to contract to produce the number of jobs promised.

“(5) Provide any additional documentation requested by the Rural Center to complete its review.

“In awarding grants under this section, the Rural Center shall give preference to a resident company. For purposes of this section, the term ‘resident company’ means a company that has paid unemployment taxes or income taxes in this State and whose principal place of business is located in this State. An application for a project that serves an economically distressed area shall have priority over a project that does not. A Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant to assist with water infrastructure needs is not subject to the provisions of

G.S. 143-355.4

. The Board of Directors of the Rural Center may establish additional criteria to effectively allocate the funds appropriated in this section.

“(f) Grant Applications. — Any application for a grant under the provisions of this section shall be submitted by the local government unit to the Rural Center. An application shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the Rural Center and shall contain the information required by or subsequently requested by the Rural Center in order to make a determination on the application. An application that does not contain information required for the application or requested by the Rural Center is incomplete and is not eligible for consideration.

“(g) Administrative Costs. — The Rural Center may use up to four percent (4%) of the funds appropriated in this section to cover administrative costs for the life of the grant program created under the provisions of this section.

“(h) Loans Prohibited. — The Rural Center shall not use the funds appropriated in this section to make loans.

“(i) Reports. — By September 1 of each year, and more frequently as requested, the Rural Center shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division concerning the progress of the emergency Rural Jobs Infrastructure Grant program created under the provisions of this section.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 32.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 6.2(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Definition. — For purposes of this section, the term ‘non-State entity’ is as defined in

G.S. 143C-1-1

.

“(b) Reporting Requirement. — Unless required to report on the use of funds under another provision of law, and by no later than June 30, 2019, each non-State entity receiving expansion funds appropriated in this act or S.L. 2017-57 for the 2018-2019 fiscal year shall submit a report to the Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly that provides all of the following information:

“(1) A description of how the funds are used or are to be used, including outcomes and specific deliverables achieved.

“(2) The amount of State funds received and expended during the 2018-2019 fiscal year.

“(3) The amount of State funds expended for administrative purposes during the 2018-2019 fiscal year, including the amount of State funds expended for salaries and benefits.

“(4) For each employee, the amount of State funds used for the employee’s annual salary.

“(c) Funds Shall Not Revert. — Notwithstanding the date set forth in G.S. 143C-6-23(f1)(1), expansion funds from the net General Fund appropriations or allocations in this act to a non-State entity shall not be subject to the return requirement set forth in G.S. 143C-6-23(f1)(1) until June 30, 2020.”